test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_CW_jooweshk_gt-norm.yaml
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px3Sg: [jooweshkshibniin, jooweshkmishbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px3Sg: [jooweshkshibniing, jooweshkmishbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Obv+PxX: [jooweshkshibniin, jooweshkmishbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc+PxX: [jooweshkshibniing, jooweshkmishbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl+PxX: [jooweshkshibniig, jooweshkmishbaniig]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 5, 6, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Obv+Px1Pl: [njooweshknaanbaniin, njooweshkminaanbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Loc+Px1Pl: [njooweshknaanbaniing, njooweshkminaanbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Pl+Px1Pl: [njooweshknaanbaniig, njooweshkminaanbaniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Obv+Px21Pl: [gjooweshknaanbaniin, gjooweshkminaanbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Loc+Px21Pl: [gjooweshknaanbaniing, gjooweshkminaanbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Pl+Px21Pl: [gjooweshknaanbaniig, gjooweshkminaanbaniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Obv+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkwaabniin, gjooweshkmiwaabniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Loc+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkwaabniing, gjooweshkmiwaabniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Pl+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkwaabniig, gjooweshkmiwaabniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Obv+Px3Pl: [jooweshkwaabniin, jooweshkmiwaabniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Loc+Px3Pl: [jooweshkwaabniing, jooweshkmiwaabniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Obv+Px4: [jooweshkniwbaniin, jooweshkminwibniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Loc+Px4: [jooweshkniwbaniing, jooweshkminwibniing]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [2, 4, 6, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Obv: jooweshkoonyshibniin
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonyshibniing
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: jooweshkoonyshibniig
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Obv: jooweshkoonsshibniin
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonsshibniing
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: jooweshkoonsshibniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 4, 5]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 4, 6]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 4, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 5, 6]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 5, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 6, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 4, 5, 6]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonyshinaanba, njooweshkoonymishnaanba]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonyshinaandig, njooweshkoonymishnaandig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonsshinaanba, njooweshkoonsmishnaanba]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonsshinaandig, njooweshkoonsmishnaandig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonyshinaanba, gjooweshkoonymishnaanba]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonyshinaandig, gjooweshkoonymishnaandig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonyshiwaaba, gjooweshkoonymishwaaba]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonyshiwaadig, gjooweshkoonymishwaadig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonsshinaanba, gjooweshkoonsmishnaanba]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonsshinaandig, gjooweshkoonsmishnaandig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonsshiwaaba, gjooweshkoonsmishwaaba]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonsshiwaadig, gjooweshkoonsmishwaadig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px4: [jooweshkoonyshinwiba, jooweshkoonymishniwba]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px4: [jooweshkoonsshinwiba, jooweshkoonsmishniwba]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 4, 5, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Obv+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonyshinaanin, njooweshkoonymishnaanin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Loc+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonyshinaaning, njooweshkoonymishnaaning]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Pl+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonyshinaanig, njooweshkoonymishnaanig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Obv+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonsshinaanin, njooweshkoonsmishnaanin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonsshinaaning, njooweshkoonsmishnaaning]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonsshinaanig, njooweshkoonsmishnaanig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Obv+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonyshinaanin, gjooweshkoonymishnaanin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Loc+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonyshinaaning, gjooweshkoonymishnaaning]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Pl+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonyshinaanig, gjooweshkoonymishnaanig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Obv+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonyshiwaan, gjooweshkoonymishwaan]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Loc+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonyshiwaang, gjooweshkoonymishwaang]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Pl+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonyshiwaag, gjooweshkoonymishwaag]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Obv+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonsshinaanin, gjooweshkoonsmishnaanin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonsshinaaning, gjooweshkoonsmishnaaning]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonsshinaanig, gjooweshkoonsmishnaanig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Obv+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonsshiwaan, gjooweshkoonsmishwaan]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonsshiwaang, gjooweshkoonsmishwaang]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonsshiwaag, gjooweshkoonsmishwaag]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Obv+Px3Pl: [jooweshkoonyshiwaan, jooweshkoonymishwaan]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Loc+Px3Pl: [jooweshkoonyshiwaang, jooweshkoonymishwaang]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Obv+Px4: [jooweshkoonyshinwan, jooweshkoonymishniwan]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Loc+Px4: [jooweshkoonyshiniing, jooweshkoonymishniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Obv+Px3Pl: [jooweshkoonsshiwaan, jooweshkoonsmishwaan]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc+Px3Pl: [jooweshkoonsshiwaang, jooweshkoonsmishwaang]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Obv+Px4: [jooweshkoonsshinwan, jooweshkoonsmishniwan]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc+Px4: [jooweshkoonsshiniing, jooweshkoonsmishniing]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 4, 6, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonyshibniin, njooweshkoonymishbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonyshibniing, njooweshkoonymishbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonyshibniig, njooweshkoonymishbaniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonsshibniin, njooweshkoonsmishbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonsshibniing, njooweshkoonsmishbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonsshibniig, njooweshkoonsmishbaniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonyshibniin, gjooweshkoonymishbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonyshibniing, gjooweshkoonymishbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonyshibniig, gjooweshkoonymishbaniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonsshibniin, gjooweshkoonsmishbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonsshibniing, gjooweshkoonsmishbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonsshibniig, gjooweshkoonsmishbaniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px3Sg: [jooweshkoonyshibniin, jooweshkoonymishbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px3Sg: [jooweshkoonyshibniing, jooweshkoonymishbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px3Sg: [jooweshkoonsshibniin, jooweshkoonsmishbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px3Sg: [jooweshkoonsshibniing, jooweshkoonsmishbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Obv+PxX: [jooweshkoonyshibniin, jooweshkoonymishbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc+PxX: [jooweshkoonyshibniing, jooweshkoonymishbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl+PxX: [jooweshkoonyshibniig, jooweshkoonymishbaniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Obv+PxX: [jooweshkoonsshibniin, jooweshkoonsmishbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc+PxX: [jooweshkoonsshibniing, jooweshkoonsmishbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl+PxX: [jooweshkoonsshibniig, jooweshkoonsmishbaniig]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 5, 6, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Obv+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonynaanbaniin, njooweshkoonyminaanbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Loc+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonynaanbaniing, njooweshkoonyminaanbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Pl+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonynaanbaniig, njooweshkoonyminaanbaniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Obv+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonsnaanbaniin, njooweshkoonsminaanbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonsnaanbaniing, njooweshkoonsminaanbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonsnaanbaniig, njooweshkoonsminaanbaniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Obv+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonynaanbaniin, gjooweshkoonyminaanbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Loc+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonynaanbaniing, gjooweshkoonyminaanbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Pl+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonynaanbaniig, gjooweshkoonyminaanbaniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Obv+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonywaabniin, gjooweshkoonymiwaabniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Loc+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonywaabniing, gjooweshkoonymiwaabniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Pl+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonywaabniig, gjooweshkoonymiwaabniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Obv+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonsnaanbaniin, gjooweshkoonsminaanbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonsnaanbaniing, gjooweshkoonsminaanbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonsnaanbaniig, gjooweshkoonsminaanbaniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Obv+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonswaabniin, gjooweshkoonsmiwaabniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonswaabniing, gjooweshkoonsmiwaabniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonswaabniig, gjooweshkoonsmiwaabniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Obv+Px3Pl: [jooweshkoonywaabniin, jooweshkoonymiwaabniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Loc+Px3Pl: [jooweshkoonywaabniing, jooweshkoonymiwaabniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Obv+Px4: [jooweshkoonyniwbaniin, jooweshkoonyminwibniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Loc+Px4: [jooweshkoonyniwbaniing, jooweshkoonyminwibniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Obv+Px3Pl: [jooweshkoonswaabniin, jooweshkoonsmiwaabniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc+Px3Pl: [jooweshkoonswaabniing, jooweshkoonsmiwaabniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Obv+Px4: [jooweshkoonsniwbaniin, jooweshkoonsminwibniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc+Px4: [jooweshkoonsniwbaniing, jooweshkoonsminwibniing]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 4, 5, 6]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 4, 5, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 4, 6, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 5, 6, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 4, 5, 6, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px1Pl: [njooweshkshinaanbaniin, njooweshkmishnaanbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px1Pl: [njooweshkshinaanbaniing, njooweshkmishnaanbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px1Pl: [njooweshkshinaanbaniig, njooweshkmishnaanbaniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkshinaanbaniin, gjooweshkmishnaanbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkshinaanbaniing, gjooweshkmishnaanbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkshinaanbaniig, gjooweshkmishnaanbaniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkshiwaabniin, gjooweshkmishwaabniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkshiwaabniing, gjooweshkmishwaabniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkshiwaabniig, gjooweshkmishwaabniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px3Pl: [jooweshkshiwaabniin, jooweshkmishwaabniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px3Pl: [jooweshkshiwaabniing, jooweshkmishwaabniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px4: [jooweshkshinwibniin, jooweshkmishniwbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px4: [jooweshkshinwibniing, jooweshkmishniwbaniing]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonyshinaanbaniin, njooweshkoonymishnaanbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonyshinaanbaniing, njooweshkoonymishnaanbaniing]
